District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.22

Lease authority for the Mayor.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor may grant a lease to Marriott International, Inc., or its designee, of the real property described as a portion of Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370, including all public alleys to be closed within these lots, on the following terms and conditions:

(1)

The lease term shall be 99 years, with lease payments beginning on the 3rd anniversary of operations; provided, that the commencement of the lease payments may be extended as mutually agreed by the parties.

(2)

Annual lease payments shall be in an amount to be negotiated by the parties; provided, that the present value of the lease payments during the lease term discounted at 6% shall equal at least $70.2 million.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

Lease payments shall be payable from cash available after the developer’s debt service payments on debt financing as permitted under the Hotel Development and Funding Agreement and lease.

(5)

A right of first refusal and an option to acquire the District’s fee interest in the real property during the lease term.

(6)

The lease may be subordinated to a leasehold mortgage securing development financing for the developer and may permit the issuance of a new lease upon foreclosure on the same terms and conditions as the prior lease.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor may assign the annual lease payments required by subsection (a) of this section to the Authority.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 222, formerly § 702
as added Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 201, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 3(c), 55 DCR 2527
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-339, § 2(a), 56 DCR 947
renumbered Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 122(e), 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 2(e), 56 DCR 6959
This section is referenced in § 10-1202.04 and § 10-1202.24.
D.C. Law 17-144 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 17-339 added par. (6).
D.C. Law 17-353, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 702 to § 222.
D.C. Law 18-78 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); in the lead-in text of subsec. (a), substituted “a portion of Lot 26 (formerly known as Lots 18, 21, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845), Square 370” for “Lots 18, 21, 801 through 806, 830 through 839, 843, and 845 in Square 370”; in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “on the 3rd anniversary of operations” for “in the 4th year of operations”; in subsec. (a)(4), substituted “debt financing as permitted under the Hotel Development and Funding Agreement and lease” for “a loan for the new convention center hotel”; and added subsec. (b).
Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 17-228 added par. (6) to read as follows: “(6) The lease may be subordinated to a leasehold mortgage securing development financing for the developer and may permit the issuance of a new lease upon foreclosure on the same terms and conditions as the prior lease.”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 17-228 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2(a) of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-412, June 18, 2008, 55 DCR 7026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of New Convention Center Hotel Combined Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-604, December 16, 2008, 56 DCR 17).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-28, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2319).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).